Washington statutes.
RCW 11.11.007

Intent—Controversies between beneficiaries and testamentary beneficiaries.

This chapter is intended to establish ownership rights to nonprobate assets upon the death of the owner, as between beneficiaries and testamentary beneficiaries. This chapter is relevant only as to controversies between these persons, and has no bearing on the right of a person to transfer a nonprobate asset under its terms in the absence of a testamentary provision under this chapter.

[ 1998 c 292 s 107.]